North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 33. Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy.

§ 120-285.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy.

The Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy is established.

The Commission shall consist of 10 members as follows:

Five members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least one of whom is a member of the minority party.

Five members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least one of whom is a member of the minority party.

Terms on the Commission are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Commission even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Commission. A member continues to serve until the member’s successor is appointed.

History.

2012-143, s. 6(a).

§ 120-286.
Purpose and powers and duties of Commission.

The Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy shall exercise legislative oversight over energy policy in the State. In the exercise of this oversight, the Commission may do any of the following:

Monitor and evaluate the programs, policies, and actions of the Oil and Gas Commission established pursuant to

G.S. 143B-293.1

, the Energy Policy Council established pursuant to

G.S. 113B-2

, the Energy Division in the Department of Commerce, the Utilities Commission and Public Staff established pursuant to Chapter 62 of the General Statutes, and of any other board, commission, department, or agency of the State or local government with jurisdiction over energy policy in the State.

Review and evaluate existing and proposed State statutes and rules affecting energy policy and determine whether any modification of these statutes or rules is in the public interest.

Monitor changes in federal law and court decisions affecting energy policy.

Monitor and evaluate energy-related industries in the State and study measures to promote these industries.

Study any other matters related to energy policy that the Commission considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

The Commission may make reports and recommendations, including proposed legislation, to the General Assembly from time to time as to any matter relating to its oversight and the powers and duties set out in this section.

History.

2012-143, s. 6(a); 2014-4, s. 4(c).

§ 120-287.
Organization of Commission.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy. The Commission may meet at any time upon the call of either cochair, whether or not the General Assembly is in session.

A quorum of the Commission is six members.

While in the discharge of its official duties, the Commission has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

. The Commission may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

.

From funds available to the General Assembly, the Legislative Services Commission shall allocate monies to fund the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy. Members of the Commission receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Commission. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Commission.

History.

2012-143, s. 6(a).

§§ 120-288 through 120-294.

Reserved for future codification purposes.